fst/newnouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
+N
+Sg 
+Pl
+Masc 
+Fem
+Obl
+Dir
^GuessNounI
^GuessNounII
^GuessNounIII
^GuessNounIV


! Masc ending in ा
! Ex: लड़का
LEXICON NounI
+N+Masc+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Dir:^े #;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl:^े #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl:^ों #;

! Masc without ा
LEXICON NounII
+N+Masc+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl:0 #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Dir:0 #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl:^ओं #;

! Fem like लड़की प्रति चिड़िया
LEXICON NounIII
+N+Fem+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl:0 #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Dir:^ियाँ #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Obl:^ियों #;

! Fem like मेज़
LEXICON NounIV
+N+Fem+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl:0 #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Dir:^एँ #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Obl:^ओं #;

LEXICON Root
अंगरक्षी NounIII;
अंडा NounI;
अंतर्पट NounII;
अंतर्भाग NounIV;
अंतावरी NounIII;
अकुटिलता NounI;
अक्षत NounII;
अक्षमाला NounIV;
अक्षयनवमी NounIII;
अघोरीपना NounI;
अजपाल NounII;
अजभक्ष NounIV;
अजरबैजानी NounIII;
अड़सट्टा NounI;
अत्रिप्रिया NounIII;
अदलबदल NounII;
अदवान NounIV;
अधिमुक्तिका NounI;
अध्यर्ध NounII;
अध्यवसाय NounIV;
अनंतशक्ति NounIII;
अनवधानता NounI;
अनामीज़ NounII;
अनायुषा NounIV;
अनुदृष्टि NounIII;
अनुनासिकता NounI;
अनुवादक NounII;
अनुविंद NounIV;
अन्त्री NounIII;
अन्धपरम्परा NounI;
अन्नमय-कोष NounII;
अन्नरस NounIV;
अपांशुला NounI;
अपार्थक NounII;
अपाला NounIV;
अप्रतीति NounIII;
अब्जा NounI;
अभया NounII;
अभरन NounIV;
अभियान्त्रिकी NounIII;
अभिसारिका NounI;
अभेद NounII;
अभेद्य NounIV;
अमिलपट्टी NounIII;
अमृतरसा NounII;
अमृतलतिका NounIV;
अमृतसंभवा NounI;
अरथी NounIII;
अरहट NounII;
अरहत NounIV;
अरुणिमा NounI;
अर्जुनछवि NounIII;
अर्द्धीकरण NounII;
अर्द्धेन्दु NounIV;
अर्हणा NounI;
अलवाई NounIII;
अल्हड़पना NounII;
अवंश NounIV;
अवटना NounI;
अवली NounIII;
अवहेल NounII;
अवहेलना NounIV;
अवेक्षा NounI;
अश्वबंधन NounII;
अश्वबन्धन NounIV;
अष्टङ्गी NounIII;
असङ्ख्यता NounI;
अस्तर NounII;
अस्ताना NounIV;
अस्पष्टता NounI;
अहम्मति NounIII;
आईन NounII;
आईनादार NounIV;
आकाशमुखी NounIII;
आक्रमिता NounI;
आज्यादोह NounII;
आटा NounIV;
आतुरतायी NounIII;
आदेशिका NounI;
आनन्दप्रद NounII;
आनन्दभैरव NounIV;
आमनी NounIII;
आराधना NounII;
आरामगाह NounIV;
आरोग्यता NounI;
आवर्त्तमणि NounIII;
आश्रित NounII;
आश्लेष NounIV;
आहति NounIII;
आहला NounI;
इंतिजाम NounII;
इंतिहा NounIV;
इकासी NounIII;
इजारदार NounII;
इजारबन्द NounIV;
इत्तला NounI;
इन्द्रधानी NounIII;
इबारत NounII;
इब्न NounIV;
इश्कपेंचा NounI;
ईंडवी NounIII;
ईढ़ NounII;
ईथर NounIV;
उकौथा NounI;
उचनि NounIII;
उछालछक्का NounII;
उछाव NounIV;
उड़न-किला NounI;
उत्तमादूती NounIII;
उत्साहहीनता NounII;
उत्स्फोटक NounIV;
उपदेवा NounI;
उबकी NounIII;
उबालना NounII;
उभयसंकट NounIV;
ऊर्जा NounI;
एकाक्षरोपनिषद NounII;
एकाग्रचित्तता NounIV;
एकासी NounIII;
ओडसी NounIII;
ओवोफ्लेविन NounII;
ओष्ठ NounIV;
ओसिनिका NounI;
कंपूचियाई NounIII;
ककहरा NounI;
कच्छा NounII;
कछार NounIV;
कड़ी NounIII;
कण्ठमाला NounI;
कपड़ा NounII;
कपड़ाहंद NounIV;
कबड्डी NounIII;
करतोया NounI;
करेजी NounIII;
करैला NounII;
करोटन NounIV;
कलाहीनता NounI;
कशेरुकी NounIII;
कसीस NounII;
कसेर NounIV;
काँकड़ा NounI;
काकी NounIII;
कादम्ब NounII;
कान NounIV;
कायरता NounI;
कारिस्तानी NounIII;
कालीसिन्ध NounII;
कालेज NounIV;
किबलई NounIII;
कीड़ा NounI;
कीवी NounIII;
कुंभार NounII;
कुंभिल NounIV;
कुन्धी NounIII;
कुम्हराना NounI;
कुवलयापीड़ NounII;
कुवाँ NounIV;
कुश्तीबाजी NounIII;
कृपणता NounI;
केन्यन NounII;
केन्सर NounIV;
केशहन्त्री NounIII;
कोफ़्ता NounI;
कोमोरोज़वासी NounIII;
कोयला NounII;
कोर NounIV;
क्रान्ति NounIII;
क्ष NounII;
क्षण NounIV;
क्षमतापूर्णता NounI;
खजुली NounIII;
खपड़ा NounI;
खरपतवार NounII;
खरब NounIV;
ख़र्राती NounIII;
खाना-पीना NounI;
खुदवाई NounIII;
खुरंट NounII;
खुरखुरापन NounIV;
खोवा NounI;
गंगई NounIII;
गजबदन NounII;
गजबाग NounIV;
गतिकी NounIII;
गदेला NounI;
गलमुच्छा NounII;
गलशोथ NounIV;
गलही NounIII;
ग़ोता NounI;
गावकुशी NounIII;
गुंडतृण NounII;
गुंडापन NounIV;
गुडूची NounIII;
गुप्तता NounI;
गुस्ताख़ी NounIII;
गूमा NounII;
गूलू NounIV;
गैया NounI;
गोपवल्ली NounIII;
गौंड NounII;
गौटमाला NounIV;
गौरा NounI;
ग्रीनलैंड-वासी NounIII;
घिरनई NounIII;
घुटन्ना NounII;
घुड़चढ़ा NounI;
घुड़चढ़ा NounIV;
चंदनीया NounI;
चंदौली NounIII;
चंद्रहार NounII;
चंद्रानन NounIV;
चन्द्रगोलिका NounI;
चन्द्रपुली NounIII;
चरचराहट NounII;
चरण NounIV;
चाँदवाला NounI;
चांडालिनी NounIII;
चिता-कर्म NounII;
चितेरा NounIV;
चित्रपर्णी NounIII;
चिन्ता NounI;
चुरकी NounIII;
चूड़ांत NounII;
चूड़ाम्ल NounIV;
चूल्हा NounI;
चोरबज़ारी NounIII;
चौबंसा NounI;
छःगुना NounII;
छक्का NounIV;
छपाई NounIII;
छिरेटा NounI;
जंतुशास्त्रज्ञ NounII;
जंत्री NounIII;
जंबु NounIV;
जनखा NounI;
जन्मभूमि NounIII;
जम्बूद्वीप NounII;
जम्बूप्रस्थ NounIV;
जल-वृष्टि NounIII;
जलभौंरा NounI;
जहन NounII;
जहर NounIV;
जादूटोना NounI;
जाफराबादी NounIII;
जामाता NounII;
जामिन NounIV;
जुरमाना NounI;
जूपिटर NounII;
जूमीज NounIV;
जॉर्जिया NounIII;
झब्बा NounI;
झाऊ NounII;
झाड़ NounIV;
टहुआटारी NounIII;
टाँका NounI;
टिसुआ NounII;
टींड NounIV;
ठर्रा NounI;
ठीकेदार NounII;
ठीहा NounIV;
डफली NounIII;
डुबाना NounI;
डॉक्टर NounII;
डॉक्टरिन NounIV;
ढेंका NounI;
तंज़ानियावासी NounIII;
तख़्त NounII;
तख़्ता NounIV;
तपसा NounI;
तरजुमा NounII;
तरणताल NounIV;
तलवारिया NounIII;
तस्मा NounI;
ताम्रचक्षु NounII;
ताम्रजाक्ष NounIV;
तियला NounI;
तिरुवनामलई NounIII;
तिलवा NounII;
तिलहन NounIV;
तुन्दिकफला NounI;
तुहिनकर NounII;
तुहिनदीधित NounIV;
तूतुकुड़ी NounIII;
तोतरा NounI;
त्रिकालज्ञ NounII;
त्रिकालदर्शीता NounIV;
त्रिसंध्या NounI;
त्वगाक्षीरी NounIII;
दंगाबाज़ NounII;
दंगेबाज़ NounIV;
दण्डाज्ञा NounI;
दरज़ी NounIII;
दरबान NounII;
दरबारीकान्हड़ा NounIV;
दर्शा NounI;
दार्शनिक NounII;
दाल NounIV;
दिनिका NounI;
दिव्यदृष्टि NounIII;
दीर्घपृष्ठ NounII;
दीर्घफल NounIV;
दुःशला NounI;
दुश्शीला NounI;
दूतता NounII;
दूतिका NounIV;
देवत्रयी NounIII;
दोआबा NounI;
दोधक NounII;
दोन NounIV;
धक्कामुक्की NounIII;
धचका NounI;
धट NounII;
धटिका NounIV;
धारा NounI;
धुंधुमार NounII;
धुकधुक NounIV;
धोखेबाजी NounIII;
नंदोला NounI;
नक्शानवीस NounII;
नक्षत्रनाथ NounIV;
नप्ता NounI;
नभोयोनि NounIII;
नयनछद NounII;
नयनपुट NounIV;
नागबला NounI;
नागमण्डलिक NounII;
नागमल्ल NounIV;
नाभि NounIII;
नाहर NounII;
निंदक NounIV;
निःसारता NounI;
निर्दोषिता NounI;
निर्धनता NounII;
निर्धारण NounIV;
निश्चिंतई NounIII;
निहठा NounI;
नीलगर NounII;
नीलग्रीव NounIV;
नेत्रहीनता NounI;
नौकराना NounII;
नौकायन NounIV;
पंचचूड़ा NounI;
पंचतंत्री NounIII;
पखेव NounII;
पखौड़ा NounIV;
पटरा NounI;
पत्थरचटा NounI;
पत्र-पेटी NounIII;
पत्रक NounII;
पत्रकारिता NounIV;
पपौता NounI;
परनाला NounII;
परपंच NounIV;
परिन्दा NounI;
परिश्रान्ति NounIII;
पर्णशुक NounII;
पर्णहरित NounIV;
पशुशाला NounI;
पाउण्ड NounII;
पाक NounIV;
पाणिनि NounIII;
पादुका NounI;
पार्श्व NounII;
पार्श्वनाथ NounIV;
पितपापड़ा NounI;
पीताब्धि NounIII;
पुराण NounII;
पुराणविद्या NounIV;
पुस्तकशाला NounI;
पेंड़की NounIII;
पोंगा NounII;
पोंछा NounIV;
पौसाला NounI;
प्रधानमंत्री NounIII;
प्रवेशद्वार NounII;
प्रवेशिका-पत्र NounIV;
प्राज्ञता NounI;
फरवरी NounIII;
फ़ज़ीहत NounII;
फ़तवा NounIV;
फीला NounI;
फोड़ी NounIII;
बचत NounII;
बचनाग NounIV;
बटुला NounI;
बदली NounIII;
बहरीनवासी NounIII;
बहुंटा NounI;
बा NounII;
बाँकड़ा NounIV;
बावरची NounIII;
बीडा NounI;
बुटिक NounII;
बुडापेस्ट NounIV;
बेकसूरी NounIII;
बोसनिआई NounIII;
ब्रजभाषा NounI;
भंडारगृह NounII;
भंडारण NounIV;
भागाधिकारी NounIII;
भीटा NounI;
भूटिआ NounII;
भूडोल NounIV;
भोगली NounIII;
मंत्रदृष्ट्रा NounI;
मजनूँ NounII;
मजमून NounIV;
मण्डली NounIII;
मध्यमिका NounI;
मरु NounII;
मरुआ NounIV;
मलयगिरी NounIII;
महानंदा NounI;
मांसाहार NounII;
माइक्रोनेसिआ NounIV;
मातहती NounIII;
मिरंगा NounI;
मिरगिया NounIII;
मीरहाज NounII;
मीरा NounIV;
मुरारी NounIII;
मूँगा NounI;
मृगमित्र NounII;
मृगया NounIV;
मैत्रायणी NounIII;
मोहठा NounI;
यमुना NounII;
यरक़ान NounIV;
याज्ञसेनी NounIII;
रक्तवरटी NounIII;
रक्ताल्पता NounI;
रघुवंशतिलक NounII;
रघुवीर NounIV;
राँची NounIII;
राज्यकाल NounII;
राज्यतन्त्र NounIV;
रासना NounI;
रुमाली NounIII;
रोआँ NounII;
रोइँसा NounIV;
लक्ष्मणा NounI;
लजवंती NounIII;
लिंग-मैल NounII;
लिंगक NounIV;
लिलाही NounIII;
लुगदा NounI;
वटी NounIII;
वधशाला NounII;
वधस्थान NounIV;
वरंवरा NounI;
वारिद NounII;
वारिधर NounIV;
वार्षभानवी NounIII;
विज्जोहा NounI;
विशालाक्ष NounII;
विशिख NounIV;
विषुव-रेखा NounI;
विसङ्गति NounIII;
वेल्स NounII;
वेश-भूषा NounIV;
व्यवस्थितता NounI;
व्यापारी NounIII;
शन्तनु NounII;
शपथ-पत्र NounIV;
शल्यकर्मी NounIII;
शवेतकाण्डा NounI;
शाहबुलबुल NounII;
शाहुतेला NounIV;
शिष्टि NounIII;
शुद्ध-वल्लिका NounI;
शोणोपल NounII;
शोध NounIV;
श्वेताद्रि NounIII;
संबद्धता NounI;
संयोजन NounII;
संयोजनकर्त्ता NounIV;
सत्रि NounIII;
सम्बद्धता NounI;
सम्भार NounII;
सम्भावना NounIV;
सलामी NounIII;
सामंतप्रथा NounI;
सार्वभौमता NounII;
साल NounIV;
सिंगी NounIII;
सुख-सम्पत्ति NounIII;
सुगुंडा NounI;
सुजात NounII;
सुझाव NounIV;
सूखा NounI;
सूथनी NounIII;
सेनजित NounII;
सेना NounIV;
स्कंदषष्ठी NounIII;
स्पर्शानंदा NounII;
स्पर्शानन्दा NounI;
स्पर्शेंद्रिय NounIV;
हंसवाहनी NounIII;
हरियाणा NounI;
हलवाइन NounII;
हलवाहा NounIV;
हिंगोली NounIII;
हैन्ड NounII;
हैबर NounIV;
होरा NounI;
